Alabama, session 2026rs, SB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 41-23-170, 41-23-171, 41-23-173,
and 41-23-174 of the Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read
as follows:
"§41-23-170
There is hereby established the Alabama Space
Authority. Commencing on October 1, 2026, the name of the
Alabama Space Authority shall be the Alabama Aerospace and
Defense Authority, and all rights, duties, property, real or
personal, and all other effects existing in the name of the
Alabama Space Authority, or in any other name by which the
authority has been known, shall continue in the name of the
Alabama Aerospace and Defense Authority. Any existing or
future reference to the Alabama Space Authority, or any other
name by which the authority has been known, in any existing
law, contract, or other instrument, shall constitute a
reference to the Alabama Aerospace and Defense Authority."
"§41-23-171
The authority shall be composed of a all of the
Page 1

The authority shall be composed of a all of the
SB228 Enrolled
following members:
(1) A representative of the University of Alabama in
Huntsville, selected by the President of the University of
Alabama in Huntsville, the.
(2) The Director of the Auburn University Aviation
Center, the or his or her designee.
(3) The President of Alabama Agricultural and
Mechanical University, the or his or her designee.
(4) The Secretary of the Alabama Department of
Commerce, the or his or her designee.
(5) The Director of the Alabama Department of Economic
and Community Affairs, the or his or her designee.
(6) The Director of the Department of Transportation,
and six other or his or her designee.
(7) The Finance Director, or his or her designee.
(8) The Secretary of Workforce, or his or her designee.
(9)a. Five members to be selected from the aerospace,
aviation, and related industries, or persons individuals
having knowledge or interest in space technology, according to
the following manner: (i) One member appointed by the
Governor, the Finance Director,; (ii) two members appointed by
the Speaker of the House of Representatives,; and (iii) two
members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
b. An appointed member of the authority shall serve a
term concurrent with his or her appointing authority and at
the pleasure of the appointing authority. Any vacancy in an
appointed position shall be filled by the original appointing
authority.
Page 2

authority.
SB228 Enrolled
(10) The Chief Executive Officer of the U.S. Space and
Rocket Center Commission, or his or her designee, who shall
serve as an ex officio nonvoting member of the authority."
"§41-23-173
(a) The authority shall have the following duties:
(1) Encourage the education and training of aerospace
professionals to pioneer the frontier of space and to develop
new methods and technologies for the exploration of space.
(2) Promote new space exploration, space tourism, and
spaceport technologies across a wide spectrum of corporate,
academic, public, and private innovation infrastructures.
(3) Sponsor aerospace conferences and business
roundtables to enable networking among key aerospace leaders
and public officials.
(4) Encourage the leveraging of venture capital and
seed public-private partnerships to promote entrepreneurship
and expand space enterprise.
(5) Propose business initiatives, tax credits, small
business incubator programs, and other initiatives to
stimulate economic development and innovation within the
aerospace and space systems communities.
(6) Perform a study on the feasibility of securing
approval for the State of Alabama to have a federally licensed
spaceport.
(7) Encourage space research and education centers to
support these programs and facilitate technology transfer.
(8) Work with the Department of Tourism, the Alabama
U.S. Space Science Exhibit and Rocket Center Commission, and
Page 3

U.S. Space Science Exhibit and Rocket Center Commission, and
SB228 Enrolled
other public agencies to communicate the multiple scientific,
educational, and commercial benefits of space exploration and
the legacy of Alabama's contributions to America's space
program to the public and to promote space tourism and
training.
(9) Develop strategies to promote and encourage private
investments in furtherance of this article.
(10) Perform any other actions necessary or convenient
to carry out its purposes and to exercise its powers pursuant
to this article to the extent permitted by law.
(b) The authority shall establish procedures for
conducting its affairs in execution of the duties and
responsibilities stated in this article, which operating
procedures shall include appropriate operational guidelines.
The authority may establish committees to conduct the work of
100 the authority and the committees may include nonmembers as
101 deemed appropriate by the authority."
102 "§41-23-174
103 For the purpose of accomplishing the duties enumerated
104 in Section 41-23-173, the authority shall have the following
105 powers:
106 (1) To acquire by purchase or gift any real, personal,
107 or mixed property necessary or convenient in connection with
108 the purpose for which the authority is formed and to hold
109 title to such property, together with all rights incidental to
110 its estate in such property.
111 (2) To lease all or any part of the facilities or
112 property of the authority to any person and, from time to
Page 4

property of the authority to any person and, from time to
SB228 Enrolled
113 time, fix, revise, charge, and collect rentals under such
114 leases.
115 (3) To adopt bylaws and policies, as approved by ADECA,
116 to administer this article, including any bylaws necessary to
117 meet the future needs of aerospace and spaceport
118 infrastructure and capabilities in this state. Upon the
119 adoption, amendment, or repeal of a bylaw or policy, the
120 authority shall provide a copy to the Legislative Council for
121 review.
122 (4) To make, enter into, and execute contracts,
123 agreements, leases, and other instruments with public and
124 private entities, and to take such other actions as may be
125 necessary or convenient to accomplish any purpose for which
126 the authority was organized or to exercise any power granted
127 under this article.
128 (5) To accept gifts, loans, and grants to expend in
129 taking any action not specifically prohibited by this article
130 in furtherance of the purposes of this article."
131 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
132 1, 2026.
Page 5

1, 2026.
SB228 Enrolled
133
134
135
136
137
138
139 ________________________________________________
140 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
141
142
143
144 ________________________________________________
145 Speaker of the House of Representatives
146
147
148 SB228
149 Senate 10-Feb-26
150 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
151 the Senate.
152
153 Patrick Harris,
154 Secretary.
155
156
157
158
159 House of Representatives
160 Amended and passed: 26-Feb-26
161
162
163
164
165 Senate concurred in House amendment 03-Mar-26
166
167
168
169
170 By: Senator Givhan
Page 6